zh-TW: 口琴簧板材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 磷青銅; 不鏽鋼; 其他
ko: 하모니카 리드 플레이트 재질: 알루미늄; 황동; 인청동; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
it: materiale per la piastra dell'ancia dell'armonica: Alluminio; Ottone; Bronzo fosforoso; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
en: Harmonica reed plate material: Aluminum; Brass; Phosphor bronze; Stainless steel; Other
sl-SI: Material piskovnih ploščic ustne harmonike: Aluminij; Medenina; Fosforjev bron; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
de: Material der Mundharmonika-Stimmplatte: Aluminium; Messing; Phosphorbronze; Edelstahl; Sonstige
nb: Materiale for rørblad til munnspill: Aluminium; Messing; Fosforbronse; Rustfritt stål; Annet
fi: Huuliharpun kielilaatan materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Fosforipronssi; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
vi: Vật liệu làm tấm lưỡi gà kèn harmonica: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Đồng phosphor; Thép không gỉ; Khác
ja: ハーモニカのリードプレートの素材: アルミニウム; 真鍮; リン青銅; ステンレススチール; その他
fr: Matériau des plaques à anches de l’harmonica: Aluminium; Laiton; Bronze phosphoreux; Acier inoxydable; Autre
th: วัสดุแผ่นลิ้นฮาร์โมนิกา: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; ฟอสเฟอร์บรอนซ์; สเตนเลส; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Armonikos liežuvėlių plokštelės medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Fosforinė bronza; Nerūdijantis plienas; Kita
zh-CN: 口琴簧片板材质: 铝; 黄铜; 磷青铜; 不锈钢; 其他
hu: Szájharmonika nádlemez anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Foszforbronz; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
el: Υλικό πλακών με γλωσσίδες φυσαρμόνικας: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Φωσφορούχος μπρούντζος; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Άλλο
da: Materiale i harmonikaens stemmeplader: Aluminium; Messing; Fosforbronze; Rustfrit stål; Andet
pt-PT: material da placa de palhetas da gaita: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze fosforoso; Aço inoxidável; Outro
cs: Materiál plátku harmoniky: Hliník; Mosaz; Fosforový bronz; Nerezová ocel; Jiné
ru: Материал язычковых пластин губной гармоники: Алюминий; Латунь; Фосфористая бронза; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
bg-BG: Материал на езичковите плочи на хармониката: Алуминий; Месинг; Фосфорен бронз; Неръждаема стомана; Друго
tr: Mızıka kamış plakası malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Fosfor bronz; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
hr-HR: Materijal ploče jezička za harmoniku: Aluminij; Mjed; Fosforna bronca; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
sv: Material för munspels rörbladplattor: Aluminium; Mässing; Fosforbrons; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
pt-BR: Material da placa das palhetas da gaita: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze fosforoso; Aço inoxidável; Outro
nl: Mondharmonica tongplaat materiaal: Aluminium; Messing; Fosforbrons; Roestvrij staal; Overig
es: Material de las placas de lengüeta de la armónica: Aluminio; Latón; Bronce fosforoso; Acero inoxidable; Otro
sk-SK: Materiál plátku harmoniky: Hliník; Mosadz; Fosforový bronz; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
pl: Materiał płytki stroikowej harmonijki: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Brąz fosforowy; Stal nierdzewna; Inny
ro-RO: Materialul plăcilor cu limbi (reed plates) ale armonicii.: Aluminiu; Alamă; Bronz fosforos; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele